Utah statutes.
17B-1-803.   Merit principles.

A local district may establish a personnel system administered in a manner that will provide for the effective implementation of merit principles that provide for:

(1)  recruiting, selecting, and advancing employees on the basis of their relative ability, knowledge, and skills, including open consideration of qualified applicants for initial appointment;

(2)  providing equitable and adequate compensation;

(3)  training employees as needed to assure high-quality performance;

(4)  retaining employees on the basis of the adequacy of their performance, and separation of employees whose inadequate performance cannot be corrected;

(5)  fair treatment of applicants and employees in all aspects of personnel administration without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, political affiliation, age, or disability, and with proper regard for their privacy and constitutional rights as citizens;

(6)  providing information to employees regarding their political rights and prohibited practices under the Hatch Political Activities Act, 5 U.S.C. Sec. 1501 through 1508 et seq.; and

(7)  providing a formal procedure for processing the appeals and grievances of employees without discrimination, coercion, restraint, or reprisal.

